Washington statutes.
RCW 44.39.020

Terms.

Members shall serve until their successors are installed as provided in RCW 44.39.015, as now or hereafter amended, at the next succeeding regular session of the legislature during an odd-numbered year, or until they are no longer members of the legislature, whichever is sooner.

[ 1980 c 87 s 38; 1977 ex.s. c 328 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 260 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 328: See note following RCW 43.21G.010.